Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.410

Payment to the public employees' and retirees' insurance account.

(1) In a manner prescribed by the state health care authority, school districts and educational service districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the amount specified for remittance in the omnibus appropriations act.

(2) The remittance requirements specified in this section shall not apply to employees of a school district or educational service district who receive insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995." [ 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 23.]